North Dakota, session 69, HB1159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 51-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Event tickets - Physical copies.
If an individual purchases a ticket required for admission to an event and the vendor
provides the ticket to the individual in digital format, the individual may request a physical copy
of the ticket, which must be provided by the vendor at no charge, except the vendor may charge
up to ten dollars in shipping and handling fees.
Page No. 1 25.0631.01000